Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.987] REPORT TO LEGISLATURE; GOVERNMENTAL ASSISTANCE. new text end new text begin A state department or agency that provides governmental assistance to individuals in Minnesota without legal status in the state must annually report to the legislature, by December 15, the total amount of governmental assistance provided to such individuals. Governmental assistance includes but is not limited to goods, services, credits, and money provided to an individual and any other expenditures or costs incurred by a state department or agency resulting directly or indirectly from such individuals. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.22, is amended to read: 171.22 UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATING TO DRIVER'S LICENSE. Subdivision 1. Violations. With regard to any driver's license, including a commercial driver's license, it shall be unlawful for any person: (1) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession, any fictitious or fraudulently altered driver's license or Minnesota identification card; (2) to lend the person's driver's license or Minnesota identification card to any other person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another; (3) to display or represent as one's own any driver's license or Minnesota identification card not issued to that person; (4) to use a fictitious name or date of birth to any police officer or in any application for a driver's license or Minnesota identification card, or to knowingly make a false statement, or to knowingly conceal a material fact, or otherwise commit a fraud in any such application; (5) to alter any driver's license or Minnesota identification card; (6) to take any part of the driver's license examination for another or to permit another to take the examination for that person; (7) to make a counterfeit driver's license or Minnesota identification card; (8) to use the name and date of birth of another person to any police officer for the purpose of falsely identifying oneself to the police officer; (9) to display as a valid driver's license any canceled, revoked, or suspended driver's license. A person whose driving privileges have been withdrawn may display a driver's license only for identification purposes; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (10) to submit a false affidavit or statement to the department on the certification required under section 171.05, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1), item (ii), subitem (C), to issue an instruction permit to a homeschool studentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (11) to use or submit a fictitious or fraudulent driver's license or Minnesota identification card or use a driver's license or Minnesota identification card not issued to that person as one's own for purposes of verifying one's lawful employment status. new text end Subd. 2. Penalties. new text begin (a) Any person who violates subdivision 1, clause (11), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000, or both. new text end new text begin (b) new text end Any person who violates subdivision 1, clause (7) or (8), is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Any person who violates any other provision of subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [181.995] EMPLOYMENT OF UNAUTHORIZED INDIVIDUALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor and industry. new text end new text begin (c) "Employee" means a person who performs services for hire in Minnesota for an employer. Employee does not include an independent contractor. new text end new text begin (d) "Employer" means a person or entity that employs one or more employees in Minnesota and includes the state and any political subdivision of the state. new text end new text begin (e) "License" means any permit, registration, certification, or other form of approval authorized by statute or rule to be issued by the state or a political subdivision of the state as a condition of doing business in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (f) "Unauthorized individual" means an individual who does not have the legal right or authorization under federal law to work in the United States as described in United States Code, title 8, section 1324a(h)(3). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin No employer shall knowingly employ an unauthorized individual as an employee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Investigations. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall investigate possible violations of this section whenever the commissioner has cause to believe that a violation has occurred, either on the basis of a report of a suspected violation or on the basis of any other credible information, including violations found during the course of an investigation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement; penalty. new text end new text begin (a) Upon a violation of this section, the commissioner shall: new text end new text begin (1) order the employer to terminate the employment of all unauthorized individuals; and new text end new text begin (2) direct the applicable agencies to suspend all licenses held by the employer for up to 14 business days. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may issue a penalty to the employer of not less than $1,000 and not more than $10,000 per violation of this section. new text end new text begin (c) In determining the length of a license suspension and the amount of any penalty, the commissioner shall consider any prior misconduct by the employer, the duration of the violation, the number of unauthorized individuals employed by the employer, and other relevant factors. new text end new text begin (d) For the purposes of this section, proof of verifying the employment authorization of an employee through the e-verify program creates a rebuttable presumption that an employer did not knowingly employ an unauthorized individual. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [412.926] SANCTUARY CITY PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition of sanctuary city. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section "sanctuary city" means a home rule charter or statutory city that prohibits, or in any way restricts, a public safety official or employee from: new text end new text begin (1) inquiring about a person's citizenship or immigration status; new text end new text begin (2) lawfully cooperating with or aiding federal officials or employees charged with enforcing immigration laws; new text end new text begin (3) providing or receiving information from federal officials or employees charged with enforcing immigration laws; new text end new text begin (4) maintaining citizenship and immigration status data; or new text end new text begin (5) exchanging citizenship and immigration status data with other federal, state, or local government entities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A home rule charter or statutory city shall not enforce an existing ordinance or policy or pass an ordinance or policy that establishes a sanctuary city. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.282, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Labor trafficking resulting in death. Whoever knowingly engages in the labor trafficking of an individual is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin 25deleted text end new text begin 30new text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $40,000deleted text end new text begin $60,000new text end , or bothnew text begin ,new text end if the labor trafficking victim dies and the death was proximately caused by the labor trafficking conduct of the offender and murder in the first or second degree was not committed thereby. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.282, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Individuals under age 18; extended period of time; great bodily harm. Whoever knowingly engages in the labor trafficking of an individual is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin 25new text end years or to a payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $40,000deleted text end new text begin $50,000new text end , or bothnew text begin ,new text end if any of the following circumstances exist: (1) the labor trafficking victim is under the age of 18; (2) the labor trafficking occurs over an extended period of time; or (3) the labor trafficking victim suffers great bodily harm and the harm was proximately caused by the labor trafficking conduct of the offender. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.282, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Other offenses. Whoever knowingly engages in the labor trafficking of another is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin 15deleted text end new text begin 20new text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $30,000deleted text end new text begin $40,000new text end , or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.283, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Penalties. A person who violates subdivision 1 may be sentenced as follows: (1) if the crime involves a victim under the age of 18, to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 15new text end years or to payment of a fine of deleted text begin $20,000deleted text end new text begin $30,000new text end , or both; or (2) in other cases, to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin fivedeleted text end new text begin tennew text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $10,000deleted text end new text begin $20,000new text end , or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.322, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the first degree. (a) Whoever, while acting other than as a prostitute or patron, intentionally does any of the following may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin 25deleted text end new text begin 30new text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $50,000deleted text end new text begin $60,000new text end , or both: (1) solicits or induces an individual under the age of 18 years to practice prostitution; (2) promotes the prostitution of an individual under the age of 18 years; (3) receives profit, knowing or having reason to know that it is derived from the prostitution, or the promotion of the prostitution, of an individual under the age of 18 years; or (4) engages in the sex trafficking of an individual under the age of 18 years. (b) Whoever violates paragraph (a) or subdivision 1a may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 35new text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $60,000deleted text end new text begin $70,000new text end , or both, if one or more of the following aggravating factors are present: (1) the offender has committed a prior qualified human trafficking-related offense; (2) the offense involved a sex trafficking victim who suffered bodily harm during the commission of the offense; (3) the time period that a sex trafficking victim was held in debt bondage or forced or coerced labor or services exceeded 180 days; or (4) the offense involved more than one sex trafficking victim. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.322, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the second degree. Whoever, while acting other than as a prostitute or patron, intentionally does any of the following may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin 25new text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $40,000deleted text end new text begin $50,000new text end , or both: (1) solicits or induces an individual to practice prostitution; (2) promotes the prostitution of an individual; (3) receives profit, knowing or having reason to know that it is derived from the prostitution, or the promotion of the prostitution, of an individual; or (4) engages in the sex trafficking of an individual. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end